Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5016.08
Prohibited acts; penalty.

Disobedience of a subpoena or a refusal to be sworn, to answer as a witness, or to subscribe a deposition, when lawfully ordered, shall be a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 2004, LB 973, § 59.